District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0605.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the "Vaccine Administration Protection Temporary Amendment Act of
2026".
Sec. 2. An Act To relieve physicians ofliability for negligent medical treatment at the
scene of an accident in the District of Columbia, approved November 8, 1965 (79 Stat. 1302;
D.C. Official Code§ 7-401 et seq.), is amended by adding a new section 5, to read as follows:
"Sec. 5. Limitation on liability for administering vaccinations.
No licensed, certified, or registered health professional authorized to prescribe, dispense,
order, furnish, or administer vaccines, or the entity employing or contracting with such
professional, shall be liable in civil damages for any act or omission not constituting willful
misconduct or gross negligence resulting from the prescribing, dispensing, ordering, furnishing,


or administering of a vaccine or other immunizing agent, including the residual effects of the
vaccine or immunizing agent, if the prescribing, dispensing, ordering, furnishing, or
administering of the vaccine or other immunizing agent is authorized by District law, accords
with official guidance issued by the Centers for Disease Control and Protection or the
Department of Health, or is recommended by a recognized medical or public health organization
designated by the Director of the Department of Health pursuant to sections 2 and 3 of the
Community Health Amendment Temporary Act of 2025, effective December 11, 2025 (D.C.
Law 26-60; D.C. Official Code §§ 3-1201.02(11)(A), 3-1207.55 (a-1) and 7-1653.01).”
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement of the Chief Financial Officer as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
(a) This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by
the Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review
as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).
(b) This act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.